Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2116
Elementary
learning center; employees; terms and conditions of employment.

Terms and conditions of employment of school employees providing
services for an elementary learning center shall be established by the negotiated
agreement of the learning community employing such school employees to provide
services. For certificated employees as defined in section 79-824, the learning
community shall be deemed to be a public employer as defined
in section
48-801. Compensation paid to school employees for services provided to a learning
community shall be subject to the School Employees Retirement Act unless such
employee is employed by a Class V school district, in which case compensation
paid such school employee shall be subject to the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act.

Laws 2007, LB641, § 48;

Laws 2011, LB397, § 18.

Class V School Employees Retirement Act, see section 79-978.01.

School Employees Retirement Act, see section 79-901.